Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1902
Board; organization; records.

The persons who compose the plumbing board shall, within ten days after their appointments, meet in their respective city or village building or place designated by the city council, city manager, or chairman and board of trustees, and organize by the selection of one of their number as chairman; and the plumbing inspector shall be the secretary of said board. It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep full, true and correct minutes and records of all licenses issued by it, together with their kinds and dates, and the names of the persons to whom issued, in books to be provided by such city or village for that purpose, which books and records shall be open for free inspection by all persons during business hours.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 2, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 5275;

C.S.1922, § 4498;

C.S.1929, § 19-302;

R.S.1943, § 19-302;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 2, p. 211.